Massachusetts, session 194th, H3206.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Section 3 of Chapter 62 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022 official
edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following 2 definitions:-
“Fossil fuel free portfolio", a portfolio that restricts fossil fuel investments to less than
0.25% of its portfolio and has an expense ratio no higher than 1.5 times the median expense ratio
of all portfolios offered by MEFA. In addition, the fund must clearly state that fossil fuel
companies are excluded from the fund’s prospectus.
“Fossil fuel investments”, companies that own proved or probable carbon reserves or
engage in or derive revenue from one or more of the following: 1) exploration for coal, oil, or
gas, 2) extraction of coal, oil, or gas 3) processing of coal, oil, or gas, 4) refining coal, oil, or gas,
5) transmission of coal, oil, or gas, or 6) supplying equipment or services to oil fields or offshore
drilling platforms.

of 2

Section 2. Section 3 of Chapter 62 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022 official
edition is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 152 through 154 the words “a prepaid tuition
program or college savings program established by the commonwealth or an instrumentality or
authority of the commonwealth” and inserting in place thereof, the following:-
“a prepaid tuition program or college savings program established by the commonwealth
or an instrumentality or authority of the commonwealth, or any “fossil fuel free” investment
option within a prepaid tuition program or college savings program that is not otherwise
available under a program established by the commonwealth”.
of 2